Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-924
Hearing; mental health board; duties.

(1) A hearing shall be held by the mental health board to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject is mentally ill and dangerous as alleged in the petition.

(2) At the commencement of the hearing, the board shall inquire whether the subject has received a copy of the petition and list of rights accorded him or her by sections 71-943 to 71-960 and whether he or she has read and understood them. The board shall explain to the subject any part of the petition or list of rights which he or she has not read or understood. The board shall inquire of the subject whether he or she admits or denies the allegations of the petition. If the subject admits the allegations, the board shall proceed to enter a treatment order pursuant to section 71-925. If the subject denies the allegations of the petition, the board shall proceed with a hearing on the merits of the petition.

(3) Upon the agreement of all parties, a hearing before the mental health board under this section may be conducted by videoconferencing.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 45;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1035;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 44;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 112.